Connecticut, session 2026, SB00186.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That chapter 229 of the general statutes be amended to establish a
refundable credit of two thousand dollars against the personal income
tax for volunteer first responders, including firefighters, emergency
medical technicians, paramedics and civil preparedness staff.